Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,147.08
Restraining order or injunction; application by director; issued without bond.

The director may apply for a restraining order, a temporary or permanent injunction, or a mandatory injunction against any person who has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate any of the provisions of the Nebraska Seed Law or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated under such law. The district court of the county in which the violations have occurred, are occurring, or are about to occur shall have jurisdiction to grant such relief upon good cause shown. Relief may be granted notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law and shall be granted without bond.

Laws 1969, c. 759, § 9, p. 2874;

Laws 1985, LB 460, § 21;

Laws 1990, LB 37, § 8.